Massachusetts, session 194th, H2969.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.Section 94 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words "or of the public works building
police", in the first paragraph, the following new words:- "or of the police force of the Office of
Environmental Law Enforcement."
of 1